Massachusetts, session 194th, H2359.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 edition, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 45C the following new section:- “Section 45D.  Upon a request by a 
licensed funeral director or undertaker, Issuers of certificates of death pursuant to this chapter 
shall provide an original death certificate to the designated licensed funeral director’s or 
undertaker’s place of business within 24 hours from the time of the request.”